Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 1. In General

§§ 12-2-101 through 12-2-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 74, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 14, ch. 117, §§ 1, 2, Laws 1939, ch. 35, §§ 1, 2, 4, related to the Wyoming liquor commission.

§ 12-2-106.
Wyoming liquor division; created; division administrator; duties.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government, the Wyoming liquor division is created within the department of revenue. The division shall consist of the programs and functions specified under this title.

The administrator of the division shall be appointed by the director of the department of revenue and shall in accordance with W.S. 9-2-1706(c) and (d), serve at the pleasure of and may be removed at any time by the director. Subject to the approval of the director, the administrator shall take final agency action with respect to all matters before the division pursuant to this title.

The division shall administer all programs formerly administered by the Wyoming liquor commission.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 74, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to salaries, expenses and fees of public officials, see art. 14, §§ 1 and 2, Wyo. Const. and chapter 3 of title 9.

Savings clauses. —

Laws 1996, ch. 74, § 4, provides: “The validity of rules, regulations, contracts, agreements or other obligations of the Wyoming liquor commission is not affected by this act. The rules and regulations of the Wyoming liquor commission shall continue in effect until amended or repealed by rules and regulations adopted by the department of revenue pursuant to this act.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).